Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1052.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Grandfamily Assistance Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Area agency on aging." An agency designated by the department to administer and develop an area plan for a comprehensive and coordinated system of services for older people within the boundaries of a defined planning and service area.123456789101112131415161718 "Department." The Department of Aging of the Commonwealth."Eligible expense." An expense directly related to the care of a child that is incurred by the child's grandparent in a grandfamily."Fund." The Grandfamily Assistance Program Fund established under section 4."Grandfamily." A family in which an individual is a grandparent acting as the primary caregiver for the individual's grandchild whose parents cannot provide care."Program." The Grandfamily Assistance Program established under section 3.Section 3. Grandfamily Assistance Program.The Grandfamily Assistance Program is established in the department. The program shall provide grants in accordance with sections 5 and 6 to area agencies on aging that must use the grant money to provide financial assistance to grandfamilies for the reimbursement of eligible expenses.Section 4. Grandfamily Assistance Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Grandfamily Assistance Program Fund is established as a fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this act.(b) Continuing appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund, interest and other earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of awarding grants under the program.(c) Fund sources.--The department may solicit and accept funding for the program, including money appropriated by the General Assembly, Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source, which shall be deposited into the fund.20250SB1052PN1239 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. Grant applications.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall develop a grant application form and distribute the form to all area agencies on aging.(b) Duties of the area agency on aging.--An area agency on aging shall assist individuals in the area who intend to apply for a grant under the program in completing the applications and verify, in writing, on the grant application that the application complies with all of the requirements of this act. The area agency on aging shall forward the application to the department for review.Section 6. Grant requirements.(a) Eligibility.--From money in the fund, the department shall approve grants to local area agencies on aging for grandfamilies that have incurred eligible expenses. The grandfamily may not be reimbursed for an expense that is otherwise reimbursed, including payments received from the parent or an agency of the Federal, State or county government.(b) Administrative costs.--No more than 1% of the money in the fund may be used by area agencies on aging for reasonable administrative costs.Section 7. Powers and duties of department.The department shall:(1) Promulgate rules, regulations and directives necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.(2) Annually provide to the chair and minority chair of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Aging and Older Adult Services Committee of the House of Representatives the following information:20250SB1052PN1239 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) a list of area agencies on aging that applied for a grant;(ii) a list of area agencies on aging that received a grant;(iii) the total funds allocated in the program for that year; and(iv) the total funds expended by the area agencies on aging for the program for that year.(3) Post an annual report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1052PN1239 - 4 - 123456789101112